Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5538XS (3) 91 sb/js S.F. 2103 Section 1. Section 455A.18, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. For each fiscal year of the fiscal period beginning 3 July 1, 1997, and ending June 30, 2028 , there is appropriated 4 from the general fund , to the Iowa resources enhancement and 5 protection fund , the amount of twenty million dollars, to be 6 used as provided in this chapter . However, in any fiscal 7 year of the fiscal period, if moneys from the lottery are 8 appropriated by the state to the fund, the amount appropriated 9 under this subsection shall be reduced by the amount 10 appropriated from the lottery. 11